Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4808
Objection to petition.

The minor's parent or legal guardian and the minor’s legal custodian may file an objection to the petition for emancipation within thirty days of service of the notice of the hearing.

Laws 2018, LB714, § 8.